apertium-de-nl.de.dix
    <pardef n="l/iegen__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iege</l>
          <r>iegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iegst</l>
          <r>iegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iegt</l>
          <r>iegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iegen</l>
          <r>iegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iegt</l>
          <r>iegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iegen</l>
          <r>iegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ag</l>
          <r>iegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agst</l>
          <r>iegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ag</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agen</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agt</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agen</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="fl/iegen__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iege</l>
          <r>iegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iegst</l>
          <r>iegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iegt</l>
          <r>iegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iegen</l>
          <r>iegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iegt</l>
          <r>iegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iegen</l>
          <r>iegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>og</l>
          <r>iegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogst</l>
          <r>iegen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>og</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogen</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogt</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogen</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
   </pardef>

    <pardef n="beg/innen__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inne</l>
          <r>innen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>innst</l>
          <r>innen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>innt</l>
          <r>innen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>innen</l>
          <r>innen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>innt</l>
          <r>innen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>innen</l>
          <r>innen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ann</l>
          <r>innen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>annst</l>
          <r>innen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ann</l>
          <r>innen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>annen</l>
          <r>innen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>annt</l>
          <r>innen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>annen</l>
          <r>innen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="beh/alten__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alte</l>
          <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ältst</l>
          <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ält</l>
          <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alten</l>
          <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>altet</l>
          <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alten</l>
          <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ielt</l>
          <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieltst</l>
          <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ielt</l>
          <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ielten</l>
          <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieltet</l>
          <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ielten</l>
          <r>alten<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="beginnen"><i>beg</i><par n="beg/innen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="behalten"><i>beh</i><par n="beh/alten__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fliegen"><i>fl</i><par n="fl/iegen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="liegen"><i>l</i><par n="l/iegen__vblex"/></e>
